Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 9.7
COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY
DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY

40-9.7-101 to 40-9.7-123. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire article repealed, (HB 12-1315), ch. 224, p. 984, § 55, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 2007. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2012, consult the 2011 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.